Hawaii statutes.
[§587A-10] Relatives; foster placement.
(a) The department shall provide the child's relative an application to be the
child's resource family within fifteen days of the relative's request to provide
foster placement for the child. If the application is submitted and denied,
the department shall provide the applicant with the specific reasons for the
denial and an explanation of the procedures for an administrative appeal.

(b) The department and authorized agencies
shall make reasonable efforts to identify and notify all relatives of the child
within thirty days after assuming foster custody of the child. [L 2010, c 135,
pt of §1]

Case Notes

Sections 587A-2 and 587A-7 and this section do not contain an
explicit or mandatory preference in favor of relative placements at all stages
of a case. 130 H. 486 (App.), 312 P.3d 1193 (2013).

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next